Maine, session 132, LD835.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 17 MRSA §313-D, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Nonprofit charitable organizations; no fee. A bona fide nonprofit charitable,
educational, political, civic, recreational, fraternal, patriotic, religious or veterans'
organization when:
A. Games are offered exclusively to a club, group or organization composed of
individuals at least 90% of whom are under 18 years of age or to an incorporated
community organization, agency or institution;
B. Games are offered exclusively on the premises of the bona fide nonprofit charitable,
educational, political, civic, recreational, fraternal, patriotic, religious or veterans'
organization conducting beano; and
C. No fee is charged to participate in a beano game.
Sec. 2. 17 MRSA §313-D, 2nd ¶, as enacted by PL 2017, c. 284, Pt. JJJJJ, §7, is
amended to read:
Notwithstanding section 319, persons under the age of 16 years of age may take part
in a game of beano conducted under subsection 2, 3 or, 4 or 5.